District of Columbia statutes.
21-584

Witness fees.

Witnesses subpoenaed under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid the same fees and mileage as are paid to other witnesses in the court.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 760, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 567, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 150(c)(6)
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 14(l), 45 DCR 745

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-584.
1973 Ed., § 21-584.